Louisiana, session 2026, HB400.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:402(F) and 1283(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§402. Dates of primary and general elections; prohibited election days
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, every Every
bond, tax, or other election at which a proposition or question is to be submitted to
the voters, other than a recall election, shall be held only on an open primary election
date established in Subsections B, C, and D of this Section, in accordance with
Article VI, Section 22 of the Constitution of Louisiana. A recall election shall be
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-359 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 400
held only on a primary or general election date established in Subsection B, C, or D
of this Section. However, the sixth Saturday after the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in November of any congressional election year shall not be applicable in
a parish containing a municipality with a population of three hundred thousand or
more for an election relative to a parcel fee imposed within a security or
neighborhood improvement district. For purposes of this Subsection, "security or
neighborhood improvement district" means a special district, one of the primary
purposes of which is aiding in crime prevention and adding to the security of district
residents by providing for an increased presence of law enforcement personnel in the
district or otherwise promoting and encouraging security in the district.
* * *
§1283. Elections
* * *
B.(1) The governing authority of the political subdivision may call a special
election for any of these purposes to be held on any of the dates set forth in R.S.
18:402(F) and it shall call an election for any of these purposes when requested to
do so by the petition in writing of one-fourth of the electors qualified to vote at an
election.
(2) In the case of an emergency declared by the governing authority of a
political subdivision because the governing authority is unable to timely call a
special election for any of these purposes in the manner provided by law on a date
otherwise provided in R.S. 18:402(F), the governing authority may declare an
emergency and, upon application to and approval by all the following, the governing
authority of the political subdivision may call a special election for any of these
purposes to be held on a regularly scheduled general election date provided for in
R.S. 18:402:
(a) The State Bond Commission by two-thirds vote of its total membership.
(b) The governor.
(c) The secretary of state.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-359 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 400
Section 2. R.S. 42:19.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3. This Act shall take effect and become operative on January 1, 2029, if the
proposed amendment of Article VI, Section 22 of the Constitution of Louisiana contained
in the Act which originated as House Bill No. 393 of this 2026 Regular Session of the
Legislature is adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.